Vermont, session 2025-2026, H76.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5823(a) is amended to read:
(a) For any taxable year, the Vermont income of a resident individual is the
adjusted gross income of the individual for that taxable year, and the Vermont
income of a resident estate or trust is its gross income for the taxable year, less:
* * *
(2) military pay for full-time active duty with the U.S. Armed Services
earned outside the State; and the first $2,000.00 of military pay for unit
training in the State to National Guard and U.S. Reserve personnel for whom
the Adjutant and Inspector General or Reserve Component Commander
certifies that the taxpayer completed all unit training of his or her unit during
the calendar year, and who has a federal adjusted gross income of less than
$50,000.00; and State active duty subsistence and quarters allowance paid to
members of the National Guard under 20 V.S.A. § 603;
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this act shall take effect on January 1,
2026 and apply retroactively to taxable years beginning on and after January 1,
2025.
VT LEG #379039 v.1